Washington statutes.
RCW 11.32.050

Not liable to creditors.

Such special administrator shall not be liable to an action by any creditor of the deceased, and the time for limitation of all suits against the estate shall begin to run from the time of granting letters testamentary or of administration in the usual form, in like manner as if such special administration had not been granted.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.32.050. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 85; RRS s 1455; prior: Code 1881 s 1423; 1863 p 223 s 141; 1860 p 185 s 108.]